New York, session 2025-2026, A5062.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Within 14 days after the effective date of this act, the 2 commissioner of health shall promulgate rules and regulations requiring 3 nursing homes and residential health care facilities to test all resi- 4 dents of such nursing homes and residential health care facilities for 5 the novel coronavirus (COVID-19) within 7 days after a member of the 6 staff or another resident of such nursing home or residential health 7 care facility tests positive for the novel coronavirus (COVID-19) and 8 shall subsequently be tested 30 days thereafter. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03963-01-5